Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-106] Speed limit for Daniel K. Inouye highway.
[Section effective January 1, 2017.] Notwithstanding any
other law to the contrary, the speed limit for the Daniel K. Inouye highway
shall be sixty miles per hour beginning at mile marker 12; provided that the
speed limit shall be forty-five miles per hour or any other speed limit as
determined pursuant to sections 291C-102, 291C-104, or 291C-105, beginning at
the Pohakuloa training area and ending one-half mile east of the Mauna Kea
county park entrance. [L 2016, c 197, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next